Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 28. Tourism Project Incentive Program; Entertainment Districts, etc.

§ 57-28-1.
Definitions.

As used in Sections 57-28-1 through 57-28-5, the following terms and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Approved project costs” means actual costs incurred by an approved participant for land acquisition, construction, engineering, design and other costs approved by the Mississippi Development Authority relating to a tourism project. The term “approved project costs” also may include, if approved by the Mississippi Development Authority, costs described above that are incurred by an approved participant within three (3) months after the date a tourism project opens for commercial operation. All costs must be verified by an independent third party approved by the MDA. An approved participant shall pay the costs for the third party verification of costs.

“Approved participant” means a person, corporation or other entity issued a certificate by the Mississippi Development Authority under Section 57-28-5.

“MDA” means the Mississippi Development Authority.

“Tourism project” shall include an entertainment district described below and may include any of the following as may be approved by the MDA:

A hotel with a minimum private investment of Forty Million Dollars ($40,000,000.00) in land, buildings, architecture, engineering, fixtures, equipment, furnishings, amenities and other related soft costs approved by the Mississippi Development Authority, and having a minimum private investment of One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) per guest room which amount shall be included within the minimum private investment of Forty Million Dollars ($40,000,000.00);

A nationally branded, themed entertainment district consisting of restaurants, bars, amphitheaters, live theaters, other entertainment venues and commercial improvements that the MDA determines to be tourism related located within the entertainment district, with a minimum private investment of Seventy-five Million Dollars ($75,000,000.00);

A nationally branded museum/aquarium with a minimum private investment of Forty Million Dollars ($40,000,000.00); and

A public golf course with a minimum private investment of Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00).

In addition, in order for a tourism project to be eligible to qualify under the provisions of Sections 57-28-1 through 57-28-5, the tourism project must be located on a project site, and construction of the tourism project must begin no later than June 1, 2017.

“Project site” means a planned mixed use development located on at least four thousand (4,000) acres of land that will consist of commercial, recreational, resort, tourism and residential development, for which the initial phase of development shall begin no later than June 1, 2007.

“State” means the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 2, § 4; Laws, 2009, ch. 464, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 57-28-3.
Creation of Tourism Sales Tax Incentive Fund; incentive payments.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the “Tourism Sales Tax Incentive Fund,” into which shall be deposited such money as provided in Section 27-65-75(20). The monies in the fund shall be used for the purpose of making the incentive payments authorized in this section. The fund shall be administered by the MDA. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on or investment earnings on the amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. The MDA may use not more than one percent (1%) of interest earned or investment earnings, or both, on amounts in the fund for administration and management of the incentive program authorized under Sections 57-28-1 through 57-28-5.

Subject to the provisions of this section, incentive payments may be made by the MDA to an approved participant that incurs approved project costs to locate a tourism project in the state. The payments to an approved participant shall be for eighty percent (80%) of the amount of sales tax revenue collected from the operation of the tourism project, after making the diversions required in Section 27-65-75(7) and (8). The MDA shall make payments to an approved participant on a semiannual basis with payments being made in the months of January and July. The aggregate amount of incentive payments that an approved participant may receive shall not exceed thirty percent (30%) of the approved project costs incurred by the approved participant for the tourism project. Expansions, enlargements or additional investments made by an approved participant will not increase authorized incentive payments certified by the MDA. The MDA shall make the calculations necessary to make the payments provided for in this section. The MDA shall cease making incentive payments to an approved participant on the occurrence of the earlier of (i) the date that an aggregate amount of thirty percent (30%) of the approved project costs incurred by the approved participant for the tourism project has been paid to the approved participant, or (ii) ten (10) years after the date the tourism project opens for commercial operation.

If an approved participant does not use or need all of the incentive payments approved by the MDA for a tourism project, then the approved participant may request that the MDA allow the approved participant to transfer or assign part of such incentive payments to another tourism project that, because of the sales tax revenue generated by the tourism project, will produce aggregate incentive payments over the ten-year period of less than thirty percent (30%) of approved project costs incurred by the approved participant for that tourism project. There may be only one (1) such request for transfer or assignment approved by the MDA for a project site.

The total amount of incentive payments authorized for all tourism projects located on a project site shall not exceed One Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($150,000,000.00) in the aggregate.

At such time as incentive payments are no longer required to be made to an approved participant, the MDA shall notify the State Tax Commission and the sales tax revenue collected from the tourism project shall no longer be deposited into the Tourism Sales Tax Incentive Fund. Any amounts remaining in the fund that were collected from such project shall be transferred to the State General Fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 2, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Sept. 13, 2006).

§ 57-28-5.
Development, implementation and administration of incentive program; participation in incentive program; application; issuance of certificate of participation.

The MDA shall develop, implement and administer the incentive program authorized in Sections 57-28-1 through 57-28-5 and shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the development, implementation and administration of such program.

A person, corporation or other entity desiring to participate in the incentive program authorized in Sections 57-28-1 through 57-28-5 must submit an application to the MDA. Such application must contain (a) plans for the proposed tourism project; (b) a detailed description of the proposed tourism project; (c) the method of financing the proposed tourism project and the terms of such financing; and (d) any other information required by the MDA. An application must be submitted no later than June 1, 2017. The Executive Director of the MDA shall review the application and determine if it qualifies as a tourism project. If the executive director determines the proposed tourism project qualifies as a tourism project, he shall issue a certificate to the person, corporation or other entity designating such person, corporation or other entity as an approved participant and authorizing the approved participant to participate in the incentive program provided for in Sections 57-28-1 through 57-28-5.

If a person, entity or other person submits an application to the MDA to participate in the incentive program authorized in Sections 57-28-1 through 57-28-5, a gaming license may not be issued by the state for any establishment located in the project site.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 2, § 6; Laws, 2009, ch. 464, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2009.